Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 2 Rights and Privileges as to Manner of Care and Treatment
and as to Maintenance and Release of
Clinical Records

Cross references.

Medical reports in narrative form, §

24-8-826

.

When medical information may be released, §

24-12-1

et seq.

Rights of mentally ill persons regarding consent to surgical or medical treatment generally, § 31-9-4.

Law reviews.

For note, “Let Your Conscience Be Your Guide: Comparing and Contrasting Washington’s Death with Dignity Act and Pharmacy Regulations After the Ninth Circuit’s Decision in Stormans, Inc. v. Wiesman,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 613 (2018).

37-3-160.
Individual dignity of patients to be respected; treatment of the mentally ill as medical patients; use of criminal facilities and procedures.

The patient’s dignity as an individual shall be respected at all times and upon all occasions, including any occasion wherein the patient is taken into custody, detained, or transported. Mentally ill patients or those suspected of being mentally ill shall,
to the maximum extent reasonably possible, be treated at all times as medical patients. All patients shall be treated by a physician or psychologist acting within the scope of his or her license. Except where required under conditions
of extreme urgency, those procedures, facilities, vehicles, and restraining devices normally utilized for criminals or those accused of crime shall not be used in connection with the mentally ill.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-502.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 12.

Law reviews.

For note comparing procedures for hospitalization of the mentally ill in Georgia to other jurisdictions and suggesting improvements, see 7 Mercer L. Rev. 361 (1956).

For article, “Distinctive Factors Affecting the Legal Context of End-Of-Life Medical Care for Older Persons,” see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 869 (2017).

For article, “Ending-Life Decisions: Some Disability Perspectives,” see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 893 (2017).

For article, “Unbefriended and Unrepresented: Better Medical Decision Making for Incapacitated Patients Without Healthcare Surrogates,” see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 923 (2017).

For article, “Exploring the Right to Die in the U.S.,” see 33 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1021 (2017).

37-3-161.
Securing of least restrictive alternative placement; assisting patient in securing placement in noninstitutional community facilities and programs.

It is the policy of the state that the least restrictive alternative placement be secured for every patient at every stage of his medical treatment and care. It shall be the duty of the facility to assist the patient in securing placement in noninstitutional
community facilities and programs.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-502.21, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1.

37-3-162.
Patients’ care and treatment rights.

Each patient in a facility and each person receiving services for mental illness shall receive care and treatment that is suited to his needs and is the least restrictive appropriate care and treatment. Such care and treatment shall be administered skillfully,
safely, and humanely with full respect for the patient’s dignity and personal integrity.

Each patient shall have the right to participate in his care and treatment. The board shall issue regulations to ensure that each patient participates in his care and treatment to the maximum extent possible. Unless the disclosure to the patient is determined
by the chief medical officer or the patient’s treating physician or psychologist to be detrimental to the physical or mental health of the patient, and unless a notation to that effect is made a part of the patient’s record, the
patient shall have the right to reasonable access to review his medical file, to be told his diagnosis, to be consulted on the treatment recommendation, and to be fully informed concerning his medication, including its side effects
and available treatment alternatives.

It is the duty of the chief medical officer to ensure that each patient receives such medical attention as is suitable to his condition and that no treatment shall be given which is not recognized as standard psychiatric treatment, except upon the written
consent of the patient or, if applicable, his guardian having capacity to give such consent. If such consent is given by someone other than the patient or such guardian, court approval must be obtained after a full and fair hearing.

If a patient hospitalized under this chapter is able to secure the services of a private physician or psychologist, he shall be allowed to see his physician or psychologist at any reasonable time. The chief medical officer is authorized and directed to
establish regulations designed to facilitate examination and treatment which a patient may request from such private physician or psychologist.

Every patient admitted to a facility under this chapter shall be examined by the staff of the admitting facility as soon as possible after his admission.

History.
Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 15; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 14; Code 1933, § 88-514, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p.
1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 20; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 13.

Cross references.

Rights of mentally ill persons regarding consent to surgical or medical treatment generally, § 31-9-4.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Right to Refuse Psychiatric Treatment: Law and Medicine at the Interface,” see 35 Emory L.J. 139 (1986).

37-3-163.
Recognition of patient’s physical integrity; rights to refuse medication; obtaining consent to treatment and surgery; emergency surgery; immunity of hospital or physician; direction of notice of actions taken under Code section.

It shall be the policy of this state to recognize the personal physical integrity of all patients.

It shall be the policy of this state to protect, within reason, the right of every individual to refuse medication except in cases where a physician determines that refusal would be unsafe to the patient or others. If the patient continues to refuse medication
after such initial emergency treatment, a concurring opinion from a second physician must be obtained before medication can be continued without the patient’s consent. Further, in connection with any hearing under this chapter,
the patient has the right to appear and testify as free from any side effects or adverse effects of the medication as is reasonably possible.

Any patient objecting to the treatment being administered to him shall have a right to request a protective order pursuant to Code Section 37-3-148.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (e) of this Code section, consent to medical treatment and surgery shall be obtained and regulated by Chapter 9 of Title 31.

In cases of grave emergency where the medical staff of the facility in which a mentally ill individual has been accepted for treatment determines that immediate surgical or other intervention is necessary to prevent serious physical consequences or death
and where delay in obtaining consent would create a grave danger to the physical health of such person, as determined by at least two physicians, then essential surgery or other intervention may be administered without the consent
of the person, the spouse, next of kin, attorney, guardian, or any other person. In such cases, a record of the determination of the physicians shall be entered into the medical records of the patient and this will be proper consent
for such surgery or other intervention. Such consent will be valid notwithstanding the type of admission of the patient and it shall also be valid whether or not the patient has been adjudged incompetent. This Code section is intended
to apply to those individuals who, as a result of their advanced age, impaired thinking, or other disability, cannot reasonably understand the consequences of withholding consent to surgery or other intervention as contemplated
by this Code section. Any hospital or any physician, agent, employee, or official who obtains consent or relies on such consent, as authorized by this Code section, and who acts in good faith and within the provisions of this chapter
shall be immune from civil or criminal liability for his or her actions in connection with the obtaining of or the relying upon such consent; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to relieve any
hospital or any physician, agent, employee, or official from liability for failing to meet the applicable standard of care in the provision of treatment to a patient. Actual notice of any action taken pursuant to this Code section
shall be given to the patient and the spouse, next of kin, attorney, guardian, or representative of the patient as soon as practicably possible.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-508.11, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 889, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 13; Ga. L. 2011, p. 346, § 3/HB 343.

Cross references.

Rights of mentally ill persons regarding consent to surgical or medical treatment generally, § 31-9-4.

37-3-164.
“Representative,” “substantial change” defined; consultation by patient’s representative with treatment facility; notification of treatment change; guardian’s consultation and notification rights.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Representative” means the representative designated by the patient or, in the absence of such designation, the person selected as a representative in the order of listing under subsection (b) of Code Section 37-3-147 but shall not mean the patient’s
legal guardian. At the time of designation or selection, such representative shall be notified of his right to notice and to consultation under this Code section. In order to exercise such rights, the representative shall
notify the department on a form supplied by the department of his election to exercise such rights. Upon receiving such notice, the department shall thereafter provide that representative the notification and consultation
required by this Code section until that representative notifies the department to the contrary. A patient need not be notified of his representative’s rights under this Code section unless such representative has elected
to exercise such rights.

“Substantial change” means a significant change including, but not limited to, the transfer within a facility of a patient from a unit primarily serving patients under 18 years of age to a unit primarily serving patients 18 years of age or over or the
transfer of a patient from one facility to another but shall not include:

Changes in the routine day-to-day care of the patient;

Routine or periodic changes or adjustments in patient medication;

Changes relating to routine or necessary medical care needs of the patient;

Formulation of the patient’s initial individualized service plan;

Changes specifically contemplated in a service plan regarding which the representative has already received notification; or

Discharge of the patient from the facility.

At the time an adult patient’s representative is designated or selected under Code Section 37-3-147 and at least every 12 months thereafter, such patient shall be notified that, unless objected to by the patient, such representative will be permitted
to consult with the facility regarding the development of the patient’s individualized service plan and the patient’s treatment under such plan. The representative of a minor patient and the representative of an adult patient not
objecting to consultation as authorized by this Code section may consult with the facility regarding the development of such patient’s individualized service plan and the patient’s treatment under such plan.

At least seven days prior to any substantial change in the individualized service plan or treatment thereunder of an adult patient, the facility to which the patient has been admitted shall notify the patient that it will notify his representative of
such change, unless the patient objects to such notification within 24 hours. A patient’s representative shall be notified at least five days prior to any substantial change in such patient’s individualized service plan or the
treatment under such plan unless such patient is an adult and objects to such notification.

In an emergency where the delay due to providing prior notification under subsection (c) of this Code section would create serious damage to the health of the patient, such a substantial change may be made without such prior notification. The patient’s
record shall specify the circumstances surrounding the emergency. Within 48 hours after the change, an adult patient shall be notified of his right to object within 24 hours to his representative’s being notified of such change.
A patient’s representative shall be notified of such change within five days after such change occurs unless the patient is an adult and objects to such notification pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section.

Notification to representatives under subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section may be made by telephone if the date and time of such notification is entered on the patient’s clinical record and if such notification is followed within 15 days by written
notification.

A patient’s legal guardian shall have the consultation and notification rights of a patient’s representative under subsections (b) through (d) of this Code section regardless of whether the patient is a minor or whether the patient objects to such consultation
or notification. A patient for whom a legal guardian has been appointed shall not be notified of any right to object under this Code section.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-502.24, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1451, § 2.

Cross references.

Rights of mentally ill persons regarding consent to surgical or medical treatment generally, § 31-9-4.

37-3-165.
Mistreatment, neglect, or abuse of patients prohibited; use of medication, physical restraints, or seclusion restricted; standards for use of physical restraint.

Mistreatment, neglect, or abuse in any form of any patient is prohibited. Medication in quantities that interfere with the patient’s treatment program is prohibited. All medication, seclusion, or physical restraints are to be used solely for the purposes
of providing effective treatment and protecting the safety of the patient and other persons.

Physical restraints shall not be applied unless they are determined by an attending physician, a psychologist involved in the care and treatment of a patient, or a clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health involved in the care and treatment
of the patient to be absolutely necessary in order to prevent a patient from seriously injuring himself or herself or others and are required by the patient’s medical needs. Such determination shall expire after 24 hours. An attending
physician, a psychologist involved in the care and treatment of a patient, or a clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health involved in the care and treatment of the patient must then make a new determination before
the restraint may be continued. Every use of a restraint and the reasons therefor shall be made a part of the clinical record of the patient. A copy of each such entry or a summary of such entries shall be forwarded to the chief
medical officer for review. A patient placed in physical restraint shall be checked at least every 30 minutes by staff trained in the use of restraints and a written record of such checks shall be made. When the application of
a restraint is necessary in emergency situations to protect the patient from immediate injury to himself or herself or to others, restraints may be authorized by attending staff who must immediately report the action taken to the
physician and any psychologist involved in the care and treatment of the patient. The facility shall have written policies and procedures which govern the use of restraints and which clearly delineate, in descending order, the
personnel who can authorize the use of restraints in emergency situations.

For the purposes of this Code section, those devices which restrain movement, but are applied for protection from accidental injury or required for the medical treatment of the patient’s physical condition or for supportive or corrective needs of the
patient, shall not be considered physical restraints. However, devices used in such situations must be authorized and applied in compliance with the facility’s policies and procedures. The use of such devices shall be a part of
the patient’s individualized service plan.

History.
Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 16; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 15; Code 1933, § 88-515, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p.
1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 937, §§ 4, 9; Ga. L. 1997, p. 911, § 4.

Cross references.

Abuse or mistreatment of hospital patients, residents of long-term care facilities, and other institutions, §§ 31-7-9, 31-8-50 et seq., 31-8-80 et seq., 31-8-100 et seq.

Rights of mentally ill persons regarding consent to surgical or medical treatment generally, § 31-9-4.

37-3-166.
Treatment of clinical records; when release permitted; scope of privileged communications; liability for disclosure; notice to sheriff of discharge.

A clinical record for each patient shall be maintained. Authorized release of the record shall include but not be limited to examination of the original record, copies of all or any portion of the record, or disclosure of information from the record,
except for matters privileged under the laws of this state. Such examination shall be conducted on hospital premises at reasonable times determined by the facility. The clinical record shall not be a public record and no part
of it shall be released except:

When the chief medical officer of the facility where the record is kept deems it essential for continued treatment, a copy of the record or parts thereof may be released to physicians or psychologists when and as necessary for the treatment of the patient;

A copy of the record may be released to any person or entity designated in writing by the patient or, if appropriate, the parent of a minor, the legal guardian of an adult or minor, or a person to whom legal custody of a minor patient has been given by
order of a court;

(2.1)
A copy of the record of a deceased patient or deceased former patient may be released to or in response to a valid subpoena of a coroner or medical examiner under Chapter 16 of Title 45, except for matters
privileged under the laws of this state;

When a patient is admitted to a facility, a copy of the record or information contained in the record from another facility, community mental health center, or private practitioner may be released to the admitting facility. When the service plan of a
patient involves transfer of that patient to another facility, community mental health center, or private practitioner, a copy of the record or information contained in the record may be released to that facility, community
mental health center, or private practitioner;

A copy of the record or any part thereof may be disclosed to any employee or staff member of the facility when it is necessary for the proper treatment of the patient;

A copy of the record shall be released to the patient’s attorney if the attorney so requests and the patient, or the patient’s legal guardian, consents to the release;

In a bona fide medical emergency, as determined by a physician treating the patient, the chief medical officer may release a copy of the record to the treating physician or to the patient’s psychologist;

At the request of the patient, the patient’s legal guardian, or the patient’s attorney, the record shall be produced by the entity having custody thereof at any hearing held under this chapter;

A copy of the record shall be produced in response to a valid subpoena or order of any court of competent jurisdiction, except for matters privileged under the laws of this state;

(8.1)
A copy of the record may be released to the legal representative of a deceased patient’s estate, except for matters privileged under the laws of this state;

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a law enforcement officer in the course of a criminal investigation may be informed as to whether a person is or has been a patient in a state facility, as well as the patient’s current address,
if known; and

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a law enforcement officer in the course of investigating the commission of a crime on the premises of a facility covered by this chapter or against facility personnel or a threat to commit such
a crime may be informed as to the circumstances of the incident, including whether the individual allegedly committing or threatening to commit a crime is or has been a patient in the facility, and the name, address, and
last known whereabouts of any alleged patient perpetrator.

In connection with any hearing held under this chapter, any physician, including any psychiatrist, or any psychologist who is treating or who has treated the patient shall be authorized to give evidence as to any matter concerning the patient, including
evidence as to communications otherwise privileged under Code Section 24-5-501, 24-12-1, or 43-39-16.

Any disclosure authorized by this Code section or any unauthorized disclosure of confidential or privileged patient information or communications shall not in any way abridge or destroy the confidential or privileged character thereof, except for the
purpose for which such authorized disclosure is made. Any person making a disclosure authorized by this Code section shall not be liable to the patient or any other person, notwithstanding any contrary provision of Code Section
24-5-501, 24-12-1, or 43-39-16.

When a sheriff transports an adult involuntary patient to a facility, that sheriff may request in writing that a notice of such patient’s discharge be given to the sheriff; and such notice shall be provided if such patient or the patient’s guardian consents
in writing to the disclosure or if, in its discretion, the court ordering the involuntary treatment provides for such notice in the order issued pursuant to Code Section 37-3-81.1.

History.
Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 19; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 18; Code 1933, § 88-518, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.10, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.12, enacted by Ga. L. 1978,
p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 723, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 985, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, §§ 21, 22; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1072, § 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 53/HB 24.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For note, “Tort Liability in Georgia for the Criminal Acts of Another,” see 18 Ga. L. Rev. 361 (1984).

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

37-3-167.
Right of patient to examine his records and to request correction of inaccuracies; promulgation of rules and regulations; judicial supervision of files and records relating to proceedings under this chapter.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 37-3-162, every patient shall have the right to examine all medical records kept in the patient’s name by the department or the facility where the patient was hospitalized or treated.

Every patient shall have the right to request that any inaccurate information found in his medical record be corrected.

The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to implement subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section. Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to require the deletion of information by the department nor constrain the
department from destroying patient records after a reasonable passage of time.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (7) and (8) of Code Section 15-9-37 or any provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, all files and records of a court in a proceeding under this chapter since September 1, 1978, shall remain sealed and shall be open
to inspection only upon order of the court issued after petition by, or notice to, the patient and subject to the provisions of Code Section 37-3-166 pertaining to the medical portions of the record.

If any official or employee of any court or archival facility assists a person who is not an official or employee of that court or facility in attempting to gain access to any court record which the official or employee knows concerns examination, evaluation,
treatment, or commitment for mental illness, such record was created prior to September 1, 1978, and such record contains no information concerning the patient which is ordinarily public, such as the fact that a guardianship
was created, such official or employee shall seal the record if it is in the possession of the court or facility and shall inform the person seeking access that if such a record exists it is open to inspection only upon
order of the court issued after petition by, or notice to, the patient and subject to the provisions of Code Section 37-3-166 pertaining to the medical portions of the record.

Upon a petition for access to such files or records referred to in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the court should allow inspection by the person who is the subject of a record unless there are compelling reasons why it should not but should
require anyone other than the person who is the subject of a court record to show compelling reasons why the record should be opened. If access is granted, the court order shall restrict dissemination of the information
to certain persons or for certain purposes or both.

The court may refer to such files and records referred to in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection in any subsequent proceeding under this chapter concerning the same patient on condition that the files and records of such subsequent proceeding will
then be sealed in accordance with this subsection. The court may permit authorized representatives of recognized organizations compiling statistics for proper purposes to inspect and make abstracts from official records,
but without personal identifying information and under whatever conditions upon their use and distribution the court may deem proper. The court may punish by contempt any violations of any such conditions.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-502.13, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 612, § 2.

Cross references.

Release of medical information generally, §

24-12-1

et seq.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 amendment of this Code section, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 258 (1995).

37-3-168.
Right of patient’s attorney to interview physicians, psychologists, and staff attending patient; establishment of regulations as to release of information to patient’s attorney.

The patient’s attorney shall have the right, at reasonable times, to interview the physician or psychologist and staff who have attended or are now attending the patient in any facility and to have the patient’s records interpreted by them. The chief
medical officer is authorized and directed to establish reasonable regulations to make available to the patient’s attorney all such information in the possession of the facility as the attorney requires in order to advise and represent
the patient concerning his hospitalization.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-502.17, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.20, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 23.

Cross references.

Release of medical information generally, §

24-12-1

et seq.